Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,211.06
Implied consent to submit to chemical test violation; court and department records; expungement; when authorized.

(1) An abstract of the court record of every person whose license has been impounded pursuant to section 60-6,211.02 shall be transmitted to the Department of Motor Vehicles. This violation shall become part of the person's record maintained by the department for a period of not longer than ninety days. After ninety days, the department shall expunge the violation from the person's record.

(2) Any person whose license has been impounded pursuant to section 60-6,211.02 and who refused to submit to a chemical test or tests required pursuant to such section shall have the violation become part of the person's record maintained by the department for a period of not longer than one hundred twenty days. After one hundred twenty days, the department shall expunge the violation from the person's record.

Laws 1998, LB 309, § 22.